Washington statutes.
RCW 15.58.070

Pesticide annual registration fee—Expiration of registrations—Deposit in agricultural local fund.

(1) All registrations issued by the department expire December 31st of the following year except that registrations issued by the department to a registrant who is applying to register an additional pesticide during the second year of the registrant's registration period shall expire December 31st of that year.

(2) An application for registration must be accompanied by a fee of six hundred fifty dollars for each pesticide, except that a registrant who is applying to register an additional pesticide during the year the registrant's registration expires shall pay a fee of three hundred twenty-five dollars for each additional pesticide.

(3) Fees must be deposited in the agricultural local fund to support the activities of the pesticide program within the department.

(4) Any registration approved by the director and in effect on the last day of the registration period, for which a renewal application has been made and the proper fee paid, continues in full force and effect until the director notifies the applicant that the registration has been renewed, or otherwise denied in accord with the provision of RCW 15.58.110.

(5) The department must complete and post on its website a timeline for processing completed pesticide registrations.

[ 2021 c 244 s 1; 2008 c 285 s 15; 2002 c 274 s 3; (2002 c 274 s 2 expired January 1, 2004); 1997 c 242 s 2; 1995 c 374 s 66; 1994 c 46 s 1; 1989 c 380 s 6; 1983 c 95 s 2; 1971 ex.s. c 190 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 244: "This act takes effect November 1, 2021. All new or renewal applications for licensure, certification, or registration under chapter 17.21 or 15.58 RCW received on or after November 1, 2021, are subject to the provisions of this act, including all fees required by this act." [ 2021 c 244 s 16.]

Effective date—2008 c 285 ss 15-26: "Sections 15 through 26 of this act take effect January 1, 2009." [ 2008 c 285 s 27.]

Intent—Captions not law—2008 c 285: See notes following RCW 43.22.434.

Effective date—2002 c 274 s 3: "Section 3 of this act takes effect January 1, 2004." [ 2002 c 274 s 6.]

Effective date—Expiration date—2002 c 274: See note following RCW 15.58.050.

Effective date—1997 c 242: "Sections 2, 4 through 7, 11 through 15, 17, and 22 of this act take effect January 1, 1998." [ 1997 c 242 s 23.]

Effective date—1995 c 374 ss 1-47, 50-53, and 59-68: See note following RCW 15.36.012.

Effective date—1994 c 46: "Sections 1 through 20, 26, and 27 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect immediately [March 21, 1994]." [ 1994 c 46 s 28.]